District of Columbia statutes.
4-1501.11

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. The rules shall include:

(1)

Notice that applicants for employment with, and employees and unsupervised volunteers of, clearly identified covered child or youth services providers are required to apply for criminal background checks within 45 days from the date of publication of the rules;

(2)

The location of the office in which applications for criminal background checks are to be made;

(3)

Standards for determining which District agencies and private entities are considered to be covered child or youth services providers that are required to comply with the requirements of this chapter;

(4)

Procedures for covered child or youth services providers to challenge the determination that they are required to comply with this chapter;

(5)

Procedures for an applicant or employee to challenge allegations that the applicant or employee committed a proscribed offense; and

(6)

A description of the corrective or adverse actions that may be taken against any covered child or youth services provider that, or any employee of a covered child or youth services provider who, is found to have violated the provisions of this chapter.

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-353, § 211, 52 DCR 2331
This section is referenced in § 4-1501.03.
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 208 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-164, June 25, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 6500).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 208 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-2, May 3, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 3782).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 208 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-117, March 30, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3804).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 208 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-319, April 8, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4708).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 208 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-3, January 22, 2003, 50 DCR 1426).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 208 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-71, April 16, 2003, 50 DCR 3593).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 208 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-279, December 18, 2003, 51 DCR 60).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 208 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-407, March 18, 2004, 51 DCR 3659).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 208 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-630, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1143).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 211 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-30, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2993).
Delegation of Authority Under Title II of D.C. Act 15-630, the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 and any Similar Succeeding Legislation, see Mayor’s Order 2005-33, February 22, 2005 ( 52 DCR 2854).
Delegation of Authority Under Title II of D.C. Law 15-353, the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Amendment Act of 2004, see Mayor’s Order 2005-73, May 5, 2005 ( 52 DCR 5501).